dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX I Y 261
SFX I   ïo          âf         ïo
SFX I   ïo          ei         ïo
SFX I   ïo          â          ïo
SFX I   ïo          awn        ïo
SFX I   ïo          ewch       ïo
SFX I   ïo          ânt        ïo
SFX I   ïo          eir        ïo
SFX I   ïo          ait        ïo
SFX I   ïo          aet        ïo
SFX I   ïo          âi         ïo
SFX I   ïo          aem        ïo
SFX I   ïo          aech       ïo
SFX I   ïo          aent       ïo
SFX I   ïo          aid        ïo
SFX I   ïo          eais       ïo
SFX I   ïo          eaist      ïo
SFX I   ïo          aodd       ïo
SFX I   ïo          asom       ïo
SFX I   ïo          asoch      ïo
SFX I   ïo          asant      ïo
SFX I   ïo          awyd       ïo
SFX I   ïo          aswn       ïo
SFX I   ïo          asit       ïo
SFX I   ïo          aset       ïo
SFX I   ïo          asai       ïo
SFX I   ïo          asai'i     ïo
SFX I   ïo          asai'u     ïo
SFX I   ïo          asai'ch    ïo
SFX I   ïo          asai'n     ïo
SFX I   ïo          asai'r     ïo
SFX I   ïo          asem       ïo
SFX I   ïo          asech      ïo
SFX I   ïo          asent      ïo
SFX I   ïo          asid       ïo
SFX I   ïo          äed        ïo
SFX I   ïo          awyf       ïo
SFX I   ïo          eych       ïo
SFX I   ïo          ao         ïo
SFX I   ïo          aom        ïo
SFX I   ïo          aoch       ïo
SFX I   ïo          aont       ïo
SFX I   ïo          äer        ïo
SFX I   au          âf         au
SFX I   au          ei         au
SFX I   au          â          au
SFX I   au          awn        au
SFX I   au          ewch       au
SFX I   au          ânt        au
SFX I   au          eir        au
SFX I   au          ait        au
SFX I   au          aet        au
SFX I   au          âi         au
SFX I   au          aem        au
SFX I   au          aech       au
SFX I   au          aent       au
SFX I   au          aid        au
SFX I   au          eais       au
SFX I   au          eaist      au
SFX I   au          aodd       au
SFX I   au          asom       au
SFX I   au          asoch      au
SFX I   au          asant      au
SFX I   au          awyd       au
SFX I   au          aswn       au
SFX I   au          asit       au
SFX I   au          aset       au
SFX I   au          asai       au
SFX I   au          asai'i     au
SFX I   au          asai'u     au
SFX I   au          asai'ch    au
SFX I   au          asai'n     au
SFX I   au          asai'r     au
SFX I   au          asem       au
SFX I   au          asech      au
SFX I   au          asent      au
SFX I   au          asid       au
SFX I   au          äed        au
SFX I   au          awyf       au
SFX I   au          eych       au
SFX I   au          ao         au
SFX I   au          aom        au
SFX I   au          aoch       au
SFX I   au          aont       au
SFX I   au          äer        au
SFX I   Áu          âf         Áu
SFX I   Áu          ei         Áu
SFX I   Áu          â          Áu
SFX I   Áu          awn        Áu
SFX I   Áu          ewch       Áu
SFX I   Áu          ânt        Áu
SFX I   Áu          eir        Áu
SFX I   Áu          ait        Áu
SFX I   Áu          aet        Áu
SFX I   Áu          âi         Áu
SFX I   Áu          aem        Áu
SFX I   Áu          aech       Áu
SFX I   Áu          aent       Áu
SFX I   Áu          aid        Áu
SFX I   Áu          eais       Áu
SFX I   Áu          eaist      Áu
SFX I   Áu          aodd       Áu
SFX I   Áu          asom       Áu
SFX I   Áu          asoch      Áu
SFX I   Áu          asant      Áu
SFX I   Áu          awyd       Áu
SFX I   Áu          aswn       Áu
SFX I   Áu          asit       Áu
SFX I   Áu          aset       Áu
SFX I   Áu          asai       Áu
SFX I   Áu          asai'i     Áu
SFX I   Áu          asai'u     Áu
SFX I   Áu          asai'ch    Áu
SFX I   Áu          asai'n     Áu
SFX I   Áu          asai'r     Áu
SFX I   Áu          asem       Áu
SFX I   Áu          asech      Áu
SFX I   Áu          asent      Áu
SFX I   Áu          asid       Áu
SFX I   Áu          äed        Áu
SFX I   Áu          awyf       Áu
SFX I   Áu          eych       Áu
SFX I   Áu          ao         Áu
SFX I   Áu          aom        Áu
SFX I   Áu          aoch       Áu
SFX I   Áu          aont       Áu
SFX I   Áu          äer        Áu
SFX I   a           âf         a
SFX I   a           ei         a
SFX I   a           â          a
SFX I   a           awn        a
SFX I   a           ewch       a
SFX I   a           ânt        a
SFX I   a           eir        a
SFX I   a           ait        a
SFX I   a           aet        a
SFX I   a           âi         a
SFX I   a           aem        a
SFX I   a           aech       a
SFX I   a           aent       a
SFX I   a           aid        a
SFX I   a           eais       a
SFX I   a           eaist      a
SFX I   a           aodd       a
SFX I   a           asom       a
SFX I   a           asoch      a
SFX I   a           asant      a
SFX I   a           awyd       a
SFX I   a           aswn       a
SFX I   a           asit       a
SFX I   a           aset       a
SFX I   a           asai       a
SFX I   a           asai'i     a
SFX I   a           asai'u     a
SFX I   a           asai'ch    a
SFX I   a           asai'n     a
SFX I   a           asai'r     a
SFX I   a           asem       a
SFX I   a           asech      a
SFX I   a           asent      a
SFX I   a           asid       a
SFX I   a           äed        a
SFX I   a           awyf       a
SFX I   a           eych       a
SFX I   a           ao         a
SFX I   a           aom        a
SFX I   a           aoch       a
SFX I   a           aont       a
SFX I   a           äer        a
SFX I   ïa          âf         ïa
SFX I   ïa          ei         ïa
SFX I   ïa          â          ïa
SFX I   ïa          awn        ïa
SFX I   ïa          ewch       ïa
SFX I   ïa          ânt        ïa
SFX I   ïa          eir        ïa
SFX I   ïa          ait        ïa
SFX I   ïa          aet        ïa
SFX I   ïa          âi         ïa
SFX I   ïa          aem        ïa
SFX I   ïa          aech       ïa
SFX I   ïa          aent       ïa
SFX I   ïa          aid        ïa
SFX I   ïa          eais       ïa
SFX I   ïa          eaist      ïa
SFX I   ïa          aodd       ïa
SFX I   ïa          asom       ïa
SFX I   ïa          asoch      ïa
SFX I   ïa          asant      ïa
SFX I   ïa          awyd       ïa
SFX I   ïa          aswn       ïa
SFX I   ïa          asit       ïa
SFX I   ïa          aset       ïa
SFX I   ïa          asai       ïa
SFX I   ïa          asai'i     ïa
SFX I   ïa          asai'u     ïa
SFX I   ïa          asai'ch    ïa
SFX I   ïa          asai'n     ïa
SFX I   ïa          asai'r     ïa
SFX I   ïa          asem       ïa
SFX I   ïa          asech      ïa
SFX I   ïa          asent      ïa
SFX I   ïa          asid       ïa
SFX I   ïa          äed        ïa
SFX I   ïa          awyf       ïa
SFX I   ïa          eych       ïa
SFX I   ïa          ao         ïa
SFX I   ïa          aom        ïa
SFX I   ïa          aoch       ïa
SFX I   ïa          aont       ïa
SFX I   ïa          äer        ïa
SFX I   oi          of         oi
SFX I   oi          own        oi
SFX I   oi          owch       oi
SFX I   oi          ônt        oi
SFX I   oi          oir        oi
SFX I   oi          oit        oi
SFX I   oi          oet        oi
SFX I   oi          ôi         oi
SFX I   oi          ôi'i       oi
SFX I   oi          ôi'u       oi
SFX I   oi          ôi'ch      oi
SFX I   oi          ôi'n       oi
SFX I   oi          ôi'r       oi
SFX I   oi          oem        oi
SFX I   oi          oech       oi
SFX I   oi          oent       oi
SFX I   oi          oid        oi
SFX I   oi          ois        oi
SFX I   oi          oist       oi
SFX I   oi          oes        oi
SFX I   oi          oesom      oi
SFX I   oi          oesoch     oi
SFX I   oi          oesant     oi
SFX I   oi          owyd       oi
SFX I   oi          oeswn      oi
SFX I   oi          oesit      oi
