dictionaries/cy_GB.dic
tecáu/ILNQ
hymfywiocau/INQ
ymfywiocau/INQ
cwpla/AILNQ
ailfwyta/INQ
ymdroi/INQ
gwastatau/INQ
ddwysáu/INQ
harwyddocau/INQ
arwyddocau/INQ
nacáu/INQ
ymroi/INQ
llesa/AINQ
hiachau/INQ
gyfrdroi/INQ
am-droi/INQ
wastatau/INQ
hymdroi/INQ
breisgáu/INQ
cogr-droi/ILNQ
dwysáu/INQ
tecau/ILNQ
gasáu/INQ
gwtáu/INQ
nesa/AINQ
hatgoffa/AINQ
ddwysau/INQ
lesgáu/INQ
nacau/INQ
tristáu/ILNQ
llesáu/INQ
freisgáu/INQ
goffa/IN
dristáu/INQ
casáu/ILNQ
cwtáu/ILNQ
breisgau/INQ
cwpláu/ILNQ
gwrth-droi/INQ
agosáu/INQ
gwpláu/INQ
gwta/IN
dwysau/INQ
hesmwytháu/INQ
brasáu/INQ
lesáu/INQ
gwtau/IN
fwyta/INQ
atgoffa/AINQ
frasáu/INQ
coffa/ILN
lesa/AINQ
lesgau/INQ
tristau/ILNQ
freisgau/INQ
hatgoffáu/INQ
wrth-droi/INQ
decáu/INQ
llacáu/INQ
caniatáu/ILNQ
llaca/IN
dristau/INQ
bywiocáu/INQ
cwtau/ILN
wacáu/INQ
bwyta/INQ
cwplau/ILNQ
gwplau/INQ
hymdecáu/INQ
brasau/INQ
hymwacáu/INQ
gwacáu/INQ
llesgáu/INQ
lesau/IN
ymesmwytháu/INQ
frasau/INQ
lacáu/INQ
hesmwytha/AINQ
ganiatáu/INQ
atgoffáu/INQ
hatgoffau/INQ
decau/INQ
fywiocáu/INQ
ymdecáu/INQ
bywiocau/INQ
wacau/INQ
ddwysa/AINQ
cwta/ILN
ymwacáu/INQ
coffáu/ILNQ
gogr-droi/INQ
esmwytháu/INQ
hymdecau/INQ
goffáu/INQ
iacháu/INQ
hymwacau/INQ
gwacau/INQ
llesgau/INQ
hymfywiocáu/INQ
ymfywiocáu/INQ
sgïo/INQ
hailfwyta/INQ
esmwytha/AINQ
gwastatáu/INQ
harwyddocáu/INQ
arwyddocáu/INQ
nesáu/INQ
atgoffau/INQ
laca/IN
hymroi/INQ
hiacháu/INQ
fywiocau/INQ
gwpla/AINQ
ymdecau/INQ
hymesmwytháu/INQ
wastatáu/INQ
ymwacau/INQ
coffau/ILNQ
ham-droi/INQ
goffau/INQ
dwysa/AINQ
iachau/INQ
cyfrdroi/ILNQ
